Washington statutes.
RCW 42.08.130

Remedy when bond of state officer becomes insufficient.

Whenever the official bond of any state officer shall become insufficient from any cause whatever, the like proceedings may be had before the superior court of the county in which said state officer holds his or her office with reference thereto: PROVIDED, That such proceedings may be commenced by a written motion supported by affidavit.

[ 2012 c 117 s 102; 1890 p 36 s 8; RRS s 9937.]